Massachusetts, session 194th, H1590.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the Massachusetts
Trial Court shall establish a sick leave bank for Eric J. Iwaniec, an employee of the Department.
Any employee of the Department may voluntarily contribute 1 or more sick, personal or vacation
days to the sick leave bank for use by Eric Iwaniec. If Eric Iwanieci terminates employment with
the Department or requests to dissolve the sick leave bank, any remaining time in the sick leave
bank shall be transferred to the extended illness leave bank. Sick leave bank days shall not be
used for absences unrelated to the illness or disability that necessitated the establishment of the
sick leave bank as determined by the Department.
Section 2. This act shall take effect upon its passage.
of 1